California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that minor children who are residing in specialized foster care home placements on or after January 1, 1997, be allowed to remain in those homes upon reaching majority, through 22 years of age, in order to ensure continuity of care during completion of publicly funded education.

(b) A child with special health care needs may remain in a specialized foster care home, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 17710, after 18 years of age if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The child was a resident in the home prior to 18 years of age.

(2) A determination regarding whether the child may remain as a resident after 18 years of age is made through the agreement of all parties involved, including the resident, the foster parent, the social worker, the resident’s regional center case manager, and the resident’s parent, legal guardian, or conservator, as appropriate. This determination shall include a needs and service plan that contains an assessment of the child’s needs and of continued compatibility with the other children in placement. The needs and service plan shall be completed within the six months prior to the child’s 18th birthday and shall be updated with any significant change and whenever there is a change in household composition. The assessment shall be documented and maintained in the child’s file, and shall be made available for inspection by the licensing staff
 or the county child welfare agency.

(3) The regional center monitors and supervises its placements, as part of its regular and ongoing services to clients, to ensure the continued health and safety, appropriate placement, and compatibility of the developmentally disabled adult with special health care needs.

(c) The department shall notify small family home applicants, as part of its orientation process, that the state Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund does not expand existing coverage in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 1527) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for liability resulting from the provision of care to individuals over 18 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 118.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17732.2.

(a) In determining the capacity of a specialized foster care home pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or Article 2 (commencing with Section 16519.5) of Chapter 5 of Part 4, the department or county shall consider all adoptive, biological, and foster children, and children in guardianship living in the home.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 119.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17733.

All documentation prepared by the county concerning the identification of a dependent child as a child with special health care needs, the placement of such a child in a specialized foster care home, assessments and reassessments of the level of care designation, the decision to place more than two children with special health care needs in a home, and contact among the health care team plan members who are monitoring the individualized health care plan of the child, shall be made part of the child’s case record. Reports of training provided by the health care professional pursuant to the discharge plan of the facility releasing the child being placed in foster care shall also be included in the case record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1437, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

17734.

Each county shall report to the department on a regular basis on the conduct and effectiveness of the program provided for in this chapter. These reports shall be submitted in conformance with instructions provided by the department. These reports shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following data:

(a) An estimate of the number of children adjudicated dependents of the juvenile court under Section 300 who have special health care needs during the reporting period.

(b) The number of children with special health care needs in (1) hospitals or other institutional placements, (2) group homes, and
 (3) short-term residential therapeutic programs at the beginning of the reporting period.

(c) The number of children with special health care needs in specialized foster care homes during the reporting period.

(d) The number of children with special health care needs placed in specialized foster care homes during the reporting period.

(e) The cost of providing specialized placements for children with special health care needs during the reporting period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 120.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17735.

Commencing in 1991, a progress report on the program provided for in this chapter shall be included in the child welfare services report to the Legislature required by Section 16512.

The department shall not evaluate or have any responsibility for the evaluation of the in-home health care provided in specialized foster care homes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1437, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

17736.

Notwithstanding any other law, including Sections 1250, 1251, 1254, 1270, 1501, 1502, 1505, 1507, 1521, 1530.6 (as added by Chapter 391 of the Statutes of 1977), 1550, 11002, and 11154 of the Health and Safety Code, and Sections 2052, 2725, 2732, and 2795 of the Business and Professions Code, all of the following apply:

(a) (1) Counties and regional centers shall be permitted to place children with special health care needs in foster family homes, small family homes, group homes, short-term residential therapeutic programs, foster family agencies, and resource families.

(2) Foster family agencies shall be permitted to place children with special health care needs in certified family homes and resource families.

(b) Counties, regional centers, and foster family agencies shall permit all of the following:

(1) A foster parent, an assistant caregiver, an on-call assistant, and a respite caregiver meeting the requirements of paragraphs (3), (5), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section
 17731 to provide, in a specialized foster care home, specialized in-home health care to a child, as described in the child’s individualized health care plan.

(2) The licensee and other personnel meeting the requirements of paragraphs (3), (5), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 17731 to provide, in a group home, specialized in-home health care to a child, as described in the child’s individualized health care plan, provided that the child was placed as of November 1, 1993, or placed in a group home for children with special health care needs, as defined in paragraph (22) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 63.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17737.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent children with special health care needs who have adoption as a case plan goal from receiving services under this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1437, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

17738.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations to implement the program provided for in this chapter. The emergency regulations shall remain in effect for no more than 120 days, unless the department complies with all the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) as required by subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1437, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

17739.

(a) When determining the placement of a foster child who is medically fragile, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1760.2 of the Health and Safety Code, priority consideration shall be given to placement with a foster parent who is an individual nurse provider, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 14043.26 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who provides health services under the federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis and Treatment program (Section 1396d(a)(4)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code). 

(b) The priority consideration described in subdivision (a) shall be subordinate to the preference granted to a relative of the child under Section 361.3, in accordance with Section
 671(a)(19) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(c) This section does not prohibit a child welfare agency or the juvenile court from placing a medically fragile foster child in a specialized foster care home with appropriate support services or another appropriate placement if it is deemed to be in the best interest of the child.

(d) For purposes of placements made pursuant to this section, a medically fragile child shall be deemed to meet the definition of a “child with special health care needs,” as defined by Section 17710, and shall be subject to this chapter and any other applicable regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 490, Sec. 2.   (AB 1133)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.7. HEALTH CARE FOR LOW-INCOME PERSONS NOT COVERED BY THE MEDICARE PROGRAM OR THE MEDI-CAL PROGRAM [17800. - 17801.]

17800.

A not-for-profit hospital that elects to participate in the drug discount program established under Section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 256b) may enter into an agreement with the State Department of Health Services for that purpose, which shall be subject to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 716.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17801.

The State Department of Health Services shall develop a standard contract for use in an agreement entered into pursuant to Section 17800, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following terms:

(a) Initially upon contracting with the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Section 17800, the not-for-profit hospital shall agree to continue its historic commitment to the provision of charity care, as reported to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(b) The term of the contract shall continue until terminated by either party upon not less than 60 days’ prior written notice to the other party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 207, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.8. PUBLIC BENEFITS [17850. - 17852.]

17850.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to affirm the ability of counties, cities, and hospital districts to provide health care and other services to all residents, if any of these entities has decided to do so at its own discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 801, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17851.

A city, county, city and county, or hospital district may, at its discretion, provide aid, including health care, to persons who, but for Section 411 of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193; 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1621), would meet eligibility requirements for any program of that entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 801, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17852.

(a) The state, a city, county, city and county, or hospital district may collect information for the purposes of this part only as required to assess eligibility for, or to administer, public services or programs. This shall include coordinating services or programs across state and local agencies, ensuring that public services or programs adequately service individuals and diverse communities, enforcing civil rights protections, and providing access to services, programs, or benefits for which an individual may be eligible or that address needs for health, social, or other services. This section shall include third parties under contract with a public officer or agency.

(b) All types of
 information, whether written or oral, concerning a person made or kept by any public officer or agency for the purpose of assessing eligibility for, or administering the services authorized by, this part are exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), are confidential, and shall not be disclosed except as required to administer the services or as required by law, as required by a federal or state court order, or to the state or local public health officer to carry out the duties of investigation, control, or surveillance of disease, as determined by the state or local public health agency.

(c) This section shall not prohibit the sharing of data as long as it is disclosed in a manner that could not be used to determine the identities
 of the persons to whom the data pertains, alone, or in combination with other data.

(d) This section shall not prohibit the sharing of personal information when the subject of that information has provided signed, written consent allowing the information to be provided to the person requesting the information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 462.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS [18000. - 18999.98.]



  CHAPTER 1. Welfare Emergency Financing [18000. - 18005.]

18000.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the continued operation of the state plans for aid to the aged, the blind, aid to the disabled, and families with dependent children in the event that federal assistance therefor is temporarily delayed or not available, without the changes and modifications in such plans provided for in this code as a consequence of the withdrawal of federal assistance for such aid from this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18001.

As used in this chapter “joint public assistance” means aid to families with dependent children, aid to the aged, aid to the blind, and aid to the disabled, and “eligible recipient” means any person eligible for such joint public assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18002.

The Governor may, within 15 days prior to the commencement of any fiscal quarter or during any fiscal quarter, proclaim the existence of a period of welfare emergency, whenever he finds as facts all of the following:

(a) Assistance to this state for joint public assistance is provided for by the Federal Social Security Act or other federal legislation.

(b) This state has qualified to receive federal assistance for joint public assistance, and has not been notified that further payment of such federal assistance will not be made because of the failure of this state to comply with the requirements of the federal legislation.

(c) Federal assistance to this state for joint public assistance for the entire fiscal quarter has not been received, and it is improbable that such federal assistance will be received by the state prior to the usual time for transmitting such federal assistance to the counties of this state.

Any period of welfare emergency proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to this section shall commence on the date of the proclamation by the Governor, and shall continue until federal assistance is received by this state for joint public assistance for the first quarter following the date of the proclamation, or until the commencement of the second quarter following that date, whichever first occurs. In no event shall any period of welfare emergency continue for more than four calendar months, nor shall any subsequent period of welfare emergency be proclaimed unless federal assistance has been received by this state for each prior fiscal quarter commencing during any prior period of welfare emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.

Out of any money in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated, there is hereby appropriated each month to every county within this state for joint public assistance to eligible recipients, an amount, as estimated by the department, equal to the aggregate amount of federal assistance payable to this state under federal law for joint public assistance to eligible recipients within the county. This appropriation is in addition to any other appropriation to the counties of the state for joint public assistance or for any aid within the definition of joint public assistance.

Payment of the sums appropriated by this section shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 9 of Part 3 of this code.

This section shall be operative only during periods of welfare emergency duly proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 18002.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18004.

The sums appropriated by Section 18003 shall be considered for all purposes to be “federal assistance” and “grants-in-aid” from the United States government for aid to families with dependent children, aid to the aged, aid to the blind, and aid to the disabled, respectively, and shall not be considered to be state moneys or appropriations from the State Treasury. All such sums shall be subject to all of the provisions applicable to funds received by this state from the United States government, and all of the provisions of the chapters governing public assistance programs shall be construed and applied in every respect as if such funds had been in fact received by this state from the United States government. However, none of such sums shall be considered for any purpose to be federal assistance or grants for the cost of administering joint public assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18005.

Whenever federal assistance to this state for joint public assistance for any period of welfare emergency during which sums appropriated by Section 18002 have been expended is received by this state, any sums appropriated by Section 18002, which have theretofore been expended for joint public assistance pursuant to this chapter, shall be repaid to the state from the funds so received, and deposited in the General Fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the appropriation made by Section 18002.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. County Boards of Public Welfare [18100. - 18110.]

18100.

In each county, except where county boards of public welfare or boards or officials with like powers are otherwise provided under a charter, the board of supervisors may constitute a county board of public welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 64, Sec. 53.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18101.

The board of supervisors making the appointments shall designate one member to serve for one year, two for two years, two for three years, and two for four years, and upon the resignation or expiration of the term of each, his successor shall in like manner be appointed for the term of four years. Appointments to fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or removal shall be made for the residue of such terms in the same manner as the original appointments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18102.

The members of the county board of public welfare shall serve without compensation, and no person shall be appointed or shall serve on such board who is in any manner officially connected with any charitable or correctional institution within the county and supported wholly or partly at public expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18103.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall notify each person appointed to the county board of public welfare of his appointment. Within one week after receiving the notice, the persons so appointed shall appear before a judge of the superior court and qualify by taking an oath faithfully to perform to the best of their ability the duties of members of the county board of public welfare. Within one month after receiving such notice, they shall meet and organize by electing a chairman and a secretary from their own number. The secretary shall file a report of such organization, signed by himself and by the chairman, with the clerk of the board of supervisors, for the information of the board, and shall send a copy of the report to each state department having jurisdiction over any institution or function subject to supervision, inspection, or other control by the county board of public welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18104.

The board of supervisors shall appropriate and allow a sum, not exceeding fifty dollars ($50) each year, for the actual expenses of the county board of public welfare for stationery, blanks, postage stamps, traveling, and other necessary incidental expenses, presented and sworn to by its secretary, and approved by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18105.

The county board of public welfare shall meet quarterly and as much oftener as it deems necessary. It may make such rules for the regulation of its own proceedings as it deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18106.

Whenever the annual report of the board of public welfare to the board of supervisors shows that any member has been absent from two consecutive quarterly meetings, such member shall be deemed to have resigned from the board, and the board of supervisors shall thereupon fill the vacancy caused by such resignation as provided in Section 18101.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18107.

At least once each quarter and as much oftener as it deems necessary, the board of public welfare, as a body or by committee, shall visit and inspect the county hospital, the county infirmary or relief home for the aged, and the county jail. As often as it deems proper, or as it is directed by the board of supervisors or by a judge of the superior court, the board shall visit and inspect, in like manner, each jail or lockup in the county, and any charitable or correctional institution in the county, which receives any support from county funds. It shall examine every department of each institution visited and shall ascertain its condition as to effective and economical administration, and the cleanliness, discipline, and comfort of its inmates. It shall carefully study the rules prescribed by the board of supervisors for the control of each county institution, and the suggestions offered by the state departments having jurisdiction over the respective institutions, and shall ascertain whether or not such rules are being complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18108.

The board of public welfare may make suggestions for improving the administration to the persons in charge of such county institutions, and may report to the board of supervisors, or to any other official having jurisdiction, any facts which the board believes such officials should know. If the board of public welfare or one of its committees finds in any institution any condition contrary to public policy and good order, or which it believes is injurious to the county or to the inmates of the institution, it shall report such condition to the board of supervisors or to any other officials having jurisdiction, stating the facts observed and suggesting remedies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18109.

On or before the first Monday in March, June, September, and December of each year, the county board of public welfare shall make a report in writing to the grand jury of the county, if there is any, and if there is none, the board shall file the report with the district attorney who shall present it to the first grand jury thereafter constituted, as soon as impaneled and sworn. Annually on or before the first Monday in June of each year, the board shall present a report to the board of supervisors, which shall be filed as a public document with its clerk. In such annual report the county board of public welfare shall include a report of the attendance of each member of the board at each of its quarterly meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18110.

Whenever the county board of public welfare presents any report to the board of supervisors concerning an institution or function under the jurisdiction of any state department, it shall at the same time transmit a copy of such report to the state department having jurisdiction over the institution or function.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Demonstration Projects in Public Assistance [18200. - 18207.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [18200. - 18207.]

18200.

The Legislature recognizes the necessity to improve the administration of public assistance so as to minimize dependency and reduce the total costs of public welfare services by restorative and preventive measures, and to expand protective services for children and adults.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide state assistance to counties to encourage them to establish demonstration and experimental projects calculated to achieve the objectives stated in this section and to strengthen, extend, and improve public welfare services and their administration.

It is also the intent of the Legislature to encourage and aid, within the limitations of this chapter, organizations of recipients to conduct demonstration and experimental projects designed to promote a more effective and efficient system of public aid and services. The Legislature intends to encourage the participation of individuals on public assistance to the fullest extent in the workings of the public welfare program and through this chapter hopes to provide a mechanism for organized groups of recipients to mobilize their resources and through concerted and cooperative action contribute to solutions to the economic, social and personal problems which tend to prolong dependency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1949.)
-------------------------------------------

18201.

The department may authorize the payment of state funds to defray in whole or in part the cost of a project undertaken by the county department of any county or by the county departments of a group of counties or by the department in behalf of county departments generally or by an organized group of recipients, if the project is consistent with the purpose of this chapter and meets the criteria established pursuant to Section 18202. Any county shall meet at least the cost of equipment, supplies, and facilities required by the staff engaged in carrying out any project approved pursuant to this chapter, except (1) with respect to those plans submitted by an organization of recipients, and (2) that state funds may be used to defray the entire cost of any project which is undertaken by a group of counties or is directed by the department in behalf of county departments generally or is directed by a recognized institution of higher learning. To the extent this section authorizes the department or a recognized institution of higher learning to undertake and direct a project in behalf of county departments, the provisions of Section 18202 shall not apply to such projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1949.)
-------------------------------------------

18202.

The department shall develop and publish criteria for the submission and approval of county plans for projects proposed to be undertaken pursuant to this chapter. Such criteria shall be so devised as to encourage and stimulate local efforts to improve staff performance and to undertake new and experimental activities specifically designed to increase family responsibility and capacity for self-care.

Criteria shall include those plans which may be submitted by organizations of recipients within the county, when in the judgment of the director, such plans will contribute to increased social responsibility on the part of the recipients and increased knowledge concerning the rights and responsibilities of citizens. 

In order to qualify for state participation in the cost of any local project or activity, the county shall submit a plan to the department which shall provide the following assurances:

(1) The project or activity will be undertaken and directed by the county welfare department, with the exception of those plans submitted by an organization of recipients.

(2) None of the state funds will be used to offset or reduce the amount of county funds currently applied to or budgeted for ongoing administrative activities and services.

(3) The employment of personnel with qualifications consistent with the disciplines required by the project, with the exception of plans submitted by organizations of recipients in which case the department shall be responsible for evaluative functions.

(4) A system for maintaining records and methods of analyses which will permit accurate and regular evaluations of the results achieved by the project or activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1949.)
-------------------------------------------

18203.

Among the county projects approved by the department, priority shall be given to those which involve:

(a) Efforts to minimize as much as possible, within the limits of state and federal laws, the administrative differences between the several categories of assistance;

(b) Demonstrations in providing family service programs;

(c) Employment counseling, training, and placement programs for public assistance recipients;

(d) Extension of rehabilitation and self-care services for handicapped and incapacitated persons not accepted for services offered by the Department of Rehabilitation;

(e) Efforts designed to give particular attention to the family where dependency is associated with illegitimacy, parental behavior, delinquency, and other family relationship problems;

(f) Coordinated use of medical, psychiatric, and casework services with public assistance recipients;

(g) Development of caseload management and case classification programs;

(h) Homemaker services for families and adults;

(i) Protective services for both children and adults;

(j) Projects demonstrating use of preventive services related to dependency, family breakdown, or personal maladjustment; and

(k) Participation of county departments in community service programs, particularly in approaches to problems of the underprivileged presented by recipients from minority groups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1949.)
-------------------------------------------

18204.

To enable it to conduct and administer experimental projects to test methods and procedures of administering assistance and services to recipients of public social services, the department may waive the enforcement of specific statutory requirements, regulations, and standards in one or more counties or on a statewide basis by formal order of the director. The order establishing the waiver shall provide alternative methods and procedures of administration, shall not be in conflict with the basic purposes, coverage, or benefits provided by law, shall not be general in scope but shall apply only for the duration of such a project and not to exceed three years, and shall not take effect unless and until the following conditions have been met:

a. The Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare of the United States has agreed, for the same project, to waive the public assistance plan requirements relative to statewide uniformity.

b. A comprehensive plan, including an analysis of the expected costs, has been published in a newspaper of general circulation and filed with the Rules Committee of each house of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18205.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, at the request of a county, after public hearing by the county, the department may extend an experimental project for in-home supportive services established pursuant to Section 18204 for an additional period of time as long as the total duration of the project does not exceed five years. The extension shall be established by formal order of the director and shall be subject to all other requirements and conditions of the initial order establishing the project pursuant to Section 18204.

(b) In the case of a project subject to subdivision (a) that is conducted pursuant to a contract between a private provider and a county, the contract may be renewed for one or more additional terms provided the combined duration of the initial and extended contract terms does not exceed five years. A new rate of reimbursement may be negotiated consistent with the level of available funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1124, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18205.5.

The Director of Child Support Services may, pursuant to this article, approve county demonstration projects to provide employment and training services to nonsupporting, noncustodial parents of children who are recipients of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 18241) of Chapter 3.3 of Part 6 or any other public social service as defined in Section 10051. In a county operating a demonstration project pursuant to this section, the superior court may order a nonsupporting, noncustodial parent of a child receiving aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 18241) of Chapter 3.3 of Part 6 or any other public social service as defined in Section 10051 to participate, as appropriate, in job training, job search, vocational rehabilitation, and other work activities, as well as in parental development training. The superior court, county department of child support services, and the county welfare department, in a demonstration county, shall all agree to cooperate in the operation of the demonstration project.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18205 (as added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 980, Sec. 22.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

18206.

(a) The director shall specify performance and quality assurance standards to be included in any experimental project for in-home supportive services undertaken pursuant to Section 18204 or extended pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 18205.

(b) In the case of a project subject to subdivision (a) of Section 18205 that is conducted pursuant to a contract between a private provider and a county, the standards shall assure delivery of all required services at the time the services are needed, including weekends and nights; establish proper screening, training, and supervision of persons providing direct services; and institute frequent periodic quality control audits and utilization review of all services. These standards shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Quality control audits and utilization review shall be performed by entities that are independent of the county and the private contractor. The reports of the quality control audits and utilization review, excluding client confidential information, shall be made available to the public. The cost of those quality control audits and utilization review shall be considered as part of the county administrative costs for the managed contract.

(d) (1) One year after the effective date of any project for in-home supportive services established pursuant to Section 18204 or after the date of extension pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 18205, the Auditor General shall commission a study to review the performance of that project. Any independent reviewer designated in an existing contract may be commissioned to perform the study.

(2) The study shall give special attention to both of the following:

(A) The health and welfare of the recipients under the project, including the degree to which all required services have been delivered, out-of-home placement rates, prompt response to recipient complaints, and any other issue the director deems relevant.

(B) The cost implications of the project, estimating the potential for ongoing savings, if any.

(3) The study may include a fiscal audit of the contract.

(e) Projects subject to Section 18204 relating to in-home supportive services and subject to this section shall, to the greatest extent possible, permit recipients to select their own qualified provider of care and set their own service schedule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 263.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18207.

Sections 18205 and 18206 shall apply only to experimental projects for in-home supportive services established pursuant to Section 18204 that were in existence on July 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1124, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.2. Juvenile Probation Funding [18220. - 18221.]

18220.

(a) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Controller shall allocate 33.38 percent of the funds deposited in the Local Law Enforcement Services Account in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 for purposes of Section 18221.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, subsequent to the allocation described in subdivision (c) of Section 29552 of the Government Code, the Controller shall allocate 33.37876457 percent of the remaining funds deposited in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 according to the schedule in subdivision (c), for purposes of Section 18221.

(2) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, subsequent to the allocation described in
 subdivision (d) of Section 29552 of the Government Code the Controller shall allocate 33.37876457 percent of the remaining funds deposited in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount in the Local Revenue Fund 2011, in monthly installments, according to the schedule in subdivision (c), for purposes of Section 18221.
